Massachusetts, session 194th, H3164.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by deleting the section
in its entirety and replacing it with the following:
Section 38. The assessors of each city and town shall at the time appointed therefore
make fair cash valuation of all the estate, real and personal, subject to taxation therein, and such
determination shall be the assessed valuation of such estate. In determining the fair cash
valuation, the assessors shall consider any restrictions to the use of the property which have been
recorded with the deed to the property. In cities, the assessors may, in any year, divide the city
into convenient assessment districts.
The assessed valuation of real property subject to taxation under this chapter shall be
classified as follows:
of 2

Class one, residential;
Class two, open;
Class three, commercial; and
Class four, industrial.
The resulting amount shall be the taxable valuation of each class of property to which the
assessors shall apply the tax rates applicable to each class as determined under section twenty-
three A of chapter fifty-nine of the city or town, to determine the tax due and payable on such
property.
of 2